Utah statutes.
78B-2-307.   Within four years.
An action may be brought within four years:
(1)  after the last charge is made or the last payment is received:
(a)  upon a contract, obligation, or liability not founded upon an instrument
in writing;
(b)  on an open store account for any goods, wares, or merchandise; or
(c)  on an open account for work, labor or services rendered, or materials
furnished;
(2)  for a claim for relief or a cause of action under the following sections
of Title 25, Chapter 6, Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act:
(a)  Subsection 25-6-5(1)(a), which in specific situations limits the time for
action to one year, under Section 25-6-10;
(b)  Subsection 25-6-5(1)(b); or
(c)  Subsection 25-6-6(1); and
(3)  for relief not otherwise provided for by law.
